Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 4
Notice, Parties and Representation in Estate Litigation and Other Matters

§ 15-1-401. Notice — Method and time of giving.

If notice of a hearing on any petition is required and except for specific notice requirements as otherwise provided, the petitioner shall cause notice of the time and place of hearing of any petition to be given to any interested person or his attorney if he has appeared by attorney or requested that notice be sent to his attorney. Notice shall be given:

by mailing a copy thereof at least fourteen (14) days before the time set for the hearing by certified, registered or ordinary first class mail addressed to the person being notified at the post office address given in his demand for notice, if any, or at his office or place of residence, if known;

by delivering a copy thereof to the person being notified personally at least fourteen (14) days before the time set for the hearing; or

if the address, or identity of any person is not known and cannot be ascertained with reasonable diligence, by publishing at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks, a copy thereof in a newspaper having general circulation in the county where the hearing is to be held, the last publication of which is to be at least ten (10) days before the time set for the hearing.

The court for good cause shown may provide for a different method or time of giving notice for any hearing.

Proof of the giving of notice shall be made by affidavit or in any other manner permitted by the court at or before the hearing and filed in the proceeding.

§ 15-1-402. Notice — Waiver.

A person, including a guardian ad litem, conservator, or other fiduciary, may waive notice by a writing signed by him or his attorney and filed in the proceeding. The appearance in court of an interested party is a waiver of notice.

§ 15-1-403. Pleadings — When parties bound by others — Notice.

In judicial proceedings involving trusts or estates of decedents, minors, protected persons, or incapacitated persons, and in judicially supervised settlements, the following apply:

Interests to be affected shall be described in pleadings which give reasonable information to owners by name or class, by reference to the instrument creating the interests, or in other appropriate manner.

Persons are bound by orders binding others in the following cases:

Orders binding the sole holder or all coholders of a power of revocation or a presently exercisable general power of appointment, including one (1) in the form of a power of amendment, bind other persons to the extent their interests (as objects, takers in default, or otherwise) are subject to the power.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between them or among persons represented, orders binding a conservator bind the person whose estate he controls; orders binding a guardian bind the ward if no conservator of his estate has been appointed; orders binding a trustee bind beneficiaries of the trust in proceedings to probate a will establishing or adding to a trust, to review the acts or accounts of a prior fiduciary and in proceedings involving creditors or other third parties; and orders binding a personal representative bind persons interested in the undistributed assets of a decedent’s estate in actions or proceedings by or against the estate. If there is no conflict of interest and no conservator or guardian has been appointed, a parent may represent and bind his minor child.

An unborn or unascertained person who is not otherwise represented is bound by an order to the extent his interest is adequately represented by another party having a substantially identical interest in the proceeding.

Notice is required as follows:

Notice as prescribed by section 15-1-401[, Idaho Code,] of this code shall be given to every interested person or to one who can bind an interested person as described in subsection b(1) [(b)(1)] or b(2) [(b)(2)] of this section. Notice may be given both to a person and to another who may bind him.

Notice is given to unborn or unascertained persons, who are not represented under subsection b(1) [(b)(1)] or b(2) [(b)(2)] of this section, by giving notice to all known persons whose interests in the proceedings are substantially identical to those of the unborn or unascertained persons.

At any point in a proceeding, a court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interest of a minor, an incapacitated, unborn, or unascertained person, or a person whose identity or address is unknown, if the court determines that representation of the interest otherwise would be inadequate. If not precluded by conflict of interests, a guardian ad litem may be appointed to represent several persons or interests. The court shall set out its reasons for appointing a guardian ad litem as a part of the record of the proceeding.